Nebraska, session 109, LB617.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB617 LB617
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 48-102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-102 In all cases brought under sections 48-101 to 48-108, it
shall not be a defense:
(1) That (a) that the employee was negligent, unless it shall also
appear that such negligence was willful, or that the employee was in a
state of intoxication;
(2) That (b) that the injury was caused by the negligence of a
fellow employee; or
(3) That (c) that the employee had assumed the risks inherent in, or
incidental to, or arising from the failure of the employer to provide and
maintain safe premises and suitable appliances.
Such , which grounds of defense are hereby abolished.
Sec. 2. Original section 48-102, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-